Hawaii statutes.
§264-36 Conformance with county general or
master plans. All federal-aid highways shall conform to the general or
master plans of the respective political subdivisions of the State unless the
conformance jeopardizes the receipt of federal aid, in which case the governor,
by executive order, may set aside the general or master plan to the extent any
conflict prevents the receipt of federal aid on any given project or the
prosecution of the work thereunder. [L 1963, c 170, §1; Supp, §111-23; HRS
§264-36]

Case Notes

Federal-aid highway found in conformance with Oahu General
Plan. 389 F. Supp. 1102.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next